Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Bonds

183.630.
Governmental unit may issue revenue bonds for airport purposes.

For the purpose of defraying the cost of acquiring, constructing, maintaining, expanding, financing or improving any airport facilities or air navigation facilities, or any part thereof or interest therein, or contract for services therefrom the cabinet may, with the approval of the Governor, borrow money and issue negotiable bonds. A governmental unit may borrow money and issue negotiable bonds, for the same purposes, but only after an ordinance or resolution has been adopted by the legislative body specifying the proposed undertaking, the amount of bonds to be issued and the maximum rate of interest the bonds are to bear. The ordinance or resolution shall further provide that the revenue bonds are to be issued pursuant to the provisions of KRS

183.630

to

183.740

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1945 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 2; 1960, ch. 179, § 39; 1964, ch. 134, § 10; 1968, ch. 83, § 5.

183.635.
Procedure when city and county act jointly.

Where a city and county or governmental unit are acting jointly, any action contemplated by KRS

183.630

to

183.740

to be taken by the legislative body or bodies of the governmental unit, shall be taken by ordinance of such governmental unit.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 153, § 4; 1960, ch. 179, § 40; 1964, ch. 134, § 11.

183.640.
Interest rate and maturity of bonds. [Repealed.]

183.650.
Bonds negotiable and tax free — Method of sale — Payable solely from revenues.

Bonds issued pursuant to KRS

183.630

to

183.740

shall be negotiable and shall not be subject to taxation. If any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be such officer before delivery of the bonds, his signature or countersignature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until delivery. The bonds may be sold, at either a public or a private sale notwithstanding any other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, and the bonds shall be exempt from the newspaper advertisement and publications requirements for municipal bonds under KRS

424.360

, with the sale to be held in such manner, upon such terms and for such price as the governmental unit or the Finance and Administration Cabinet may determine will best effect the purposes of this chapter. The bonds shall be payable solely from the revenue derived from airport facilities or taxes levied for airport development and shall not constitute an indebtedness of the governmental unit or the Commonwealth within the meaning of the Constitution. It shall be plainly stated on the face of each bond that it has been issued under the provisions of KRS

183.630

to

183.740

and that it does not constitute an indebtedness of the governmental unit or the Commonwealth within the meaning of the Constitution.

History.

Enact. Acts 1945 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 4; 1960, ch. 179, § 42; 1980, ch. 375, § 1, effective July 15, 1980.

183.660.
Application of proceeds of bonds.

All money received from the bonds shall be applied solely for the acquisition, construction, maintenance, expansion, financing or improvement of the airport facilities or air navigation facilities, and the necessary expense of preparing, printing and selling said bonds, or to advance the payment of the interest on the bonds during the first three (3) years following the date of the bonds.

History.

Enact. Acts 1945 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 5; 1960, ch. 179, § 43; 1964, ch. 134, § 12.

183.670.
Receiver.

If there is any default in the payment of principal or interest of any bond, any court having jurisdiction of the action may appoint a receiver to administer the airport facilities on behalf of the air board, governmental unit or the Commonwealth with power to charge and collect rates, charges and fees sufficient to provide for the payment of any bonds or obligations outstanding against the airport facilities, and for the payment of operating expenses, and to apply the income and revenue in conformity with KRS

183.630

to

183.740

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1945 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 6; 1960, ch. 179, § 44.

183.680.
Maintenance, operation and depreciation funds — Rates.

At or before the issuance of bonds the legislative body of the governmental unit shall, by ordinance or resolution, set aside and pledge the income and revenue of the airport facilities into a separate and special fund to be used and applied in payment of the cost thereof and in the maintenance, operation and depreciation thereof. The ordinance or resolution shall definitely fix and determine the amount of revenue necessary to be set apart and applied to the payment of principal and interest of the bonds and the proportion of the balance of the income and revenue to be set aside as a proper and adequate depreciation account, and the remaining proportion of such balance shall be set aside for the reasonable and proper operation and maintenance of the airport facilities. The rates and fees to be charged for the services of the airport facilities shall be fixed and revised from time to time so as to be sufficient to provide for payment of interest upon all bonds and to create a sinking fund to pay the principal thereof when due, and to provide for the operation and maintenance of the airport facilities and an adequate depreciation account. The provision of KRS 183.137(2) that the money derived from the use of the airport shall be first applied to the maintenance of the airport shall not apply in the case of airport facilities for which revenue bonds have been issued under KRS

183.630

to

183.740

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1945 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 7; 1960, ch. 179, § 45.

183.690.
Transfer of surplus to depreciation account.

If a surplus is accumulated in the operating and maintenance funds equal to the cost of maintaining and operating the airport facilities during the remainder of the calendar, operating or fiscal year, and during the succeeding like year, any excess over such amount may be transferred at any time by the legislative body of the governmental unit to the depreciation account, to be used for improvements, extensions or additions to the airport facilities or the air navigation facilities.

History.

Enact. Acts 1945 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 8; 1960, ch. 179, § 46; 1964, ch. 134, § 13.

183.700.
Expenditure and investment of depreciation fund.

The funds accumulating to the depreciation account shall be expended in balancing depreciation in the airport facilities or in making new constructions, extensions or additions thereto. Any such accumulations may be invested as the legislative body of the governmental unit may designate, and if invested the income from such investment shall be carried into the depreciation account.

History.

Enact. Acts 1945 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 9; 1960, ch. 179, § 47.

183.710.
Refunding bonds.

The governmental unit may issue new bonds to provide funds for the payment of any outstanding bonds, in accordance with the procedure prescribed by KRS

183.630

to

183.740

. The new bonds shall be secured to the same extent and shall have the same source of payment as the bonds refunded.

History.

Enact. Acts 1945 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 10; 1960, ch. 179, § 48.

183.720.
Additional bonds.

If the legislative body of the governmental unit finds that the bonds authorized will be insufficient to accomplish the purpose desired, additional bonds may be authorized and issued in the same manner.

History.

Enact. Acts 1945 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 11; 1960, ch. 179, § 49.

183.730.
Additional bonds, purposes of issue.

Any governmental unit acquiring, constructing, maintaining, expanding, financing or improving any air navigation facilities or any airport facilities pursuant to the provisions of KRS

183.630

to

183.740

may, at the time of issuing the bonds for such acquisition, construction, maintenance, expansion, financing or improvement, provide for additional bonds for extensions and permanent improvements to be placed in escrow and to be negotiated from time to time as proceeds for that purpose may be necessary. Bonds placed in escrow shall, when negotiated, have equal standing with the bonds of the same issue.

History.

Enact. Acts 1945 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 12; 1960, ch. 179, § 50; 1964, ch. 134, § 14.

183.740.
KRS 183.630 to 183.730 constitutes alternate method of acquisition — Effect of other statutes.

KRS

183.630

to

183.730

shall constitute a method for the acquisition, construction, maintenance, expansion, financing or improvement of air navigation facilities or airport facilities or any part thereof or interest therein, or contract for services therefrom, by governmental units or the Commonwealth in addition or as an alternate, to any other method authorized by statute. It is intended to authorize the acquisition, construction, maintenance, expansion, financing, or improvement of additional facilities for an airport acquired under authority of KRS

183.133

or interest therein, or contract for services therefrom, as well as the original acquisition, construction, maintenance, expansion, financing, or improvement of land and other facilities for an airport. Governmental units shall have all authority conferred by KRS

183.133

for the acquisition, construction, maintenance, expansion, financing or improvement of air navigation facilities or airport facilities, or any part thereof or interest therein, or contract for services therefrom. Except as otherwise provided in KRS

183.630

to

183.730

, the provisions of KRS 183.133 to

183.138

shall apply to the operation of airport facilities acquired under KRS 183.630 to 183.730.

History.

Enact. Acts 1945 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 13; 1960, ch. 179, § 51; 1964, ch. 134, § 15; 1968, ch. 83, § 6.

183.745.
Zoning powers of department. [Repealed.]

183.746.
Zoning board for airport zoning by department. [Repealed.]

183.750.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

183.751.
Airport hazards not in public interest. [Repealed.]

183.752.
Airports’ zoning powers — Joint boards. [Repealed.]

183.753.
Granting of permits — Nonconforming uses — Variances — Marking and lighting of obstructions. [Repealed.]

183.754.
Adoption of airport zoning regulations — Administration and enforcement. [Repealed.]

183.755.
Board of appeals. [Repealed.]

183.756.
Appeal from board of appeals to courts. [Repealed.]

183.757.
Acquisition of airport protection easements. [Repealed.]

183.758.
Injunction against zoning violation. [Repealed.]

183.760.
Definitions.
[Repealed.]

183.761.
National defense
considerations in airport development. [Repealed.]